District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Porchfest Permitting Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Block Party Act of 2012, effective October 23, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-190, D.C.
Official Code § 9-631 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 9-631) is amended by adding a new paragraph (5) to
read as follows:
“(5) “Porchfest” means a distributed neighborhood music festival where
musicians perform on residents’ porches or yards.”.


(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 9-632) is amended by adding a new subsection (b-1)
to read as follows:
“(b-1) A District resident may submit a block party permit as part of a Porchfest or other
distributed neighborhood festival; provided, that the application meets the requirements of
subsection (b) of this section, section 5(b), and:
“(1) Any musical activities take place on personal property, such as a porch or
lawn, and not in the street;
“(2) No fee shall be charged to participants or attendees.”.
(c) Section 5(a) (D.C. Official Code § 9-634(a)) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) It is the policy of the District to approve block parties. The Department shall not
deny a block party application because it is part of a Porchfest or other distributed neighborhood
festival occurring on the same date.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).